Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.53.070

Valuation of assets—Books of merging trust company.

Without approval by the director, no asset shall be carried on the books of the resulting trust company at a valuation higher than that on the books of the merging trust company at the time of its last examination by a state trust examiner before the effective date of the merger or conversion.

[ 2014 c 37 s 395.]